New York, session 2025-2026, A7800.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 8 of the state finance law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 17 to read as follows: 3 17. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this chapter or any 4 other law, no claim shall be certified for payment nor shall any payment 5 be made by the comptroller or by any state department or agency to any 6 non-resident or on behalf of such non-resident where such payment is 7 intended for the provision of an abortion or any other related procedure 8 or as reimbursement for the performance of an abortion or other related 9 procedure. For the purposes of this section, "related procedure" shall 10 mean any procedure that results in the intentional termination of a 11 pregnancy at any stage of gestation. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04605-01-5